Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

General Provisions

62-39-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State Licensing and Certified Real Estate Appraisers Law.”

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Insurance adjuster acting as appraiser, OAG 99-205, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 193 (10/14/99).

62-39-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Analysis assignment” means an analysis, opinion or conclusion prepared by a real estate appraiser that relates to the nature, quality or utility of identified real estate or identified real property;

“Applicant for initial registration, licensure, or certification”:

Means any person applying for a registration, license, or certification issued under this chapter who does not currently hold a valid registration, license, or certification issued by the commission;

Includes:

Any person who previously held a registration, license or certification issued under this chapter who failed to timely renew such registration, license, or certification and is required to reapply for a new registration, license or certification; or

Any person applying for a reciprocal registration; and

Does not include:

Any person renewing an existing registration, license, or certification issued under this chapter;

A current registrant applying for a license or certification;

A current licensee applying for certification; or

Any person applying for a reciprocal license or certification if such person holds an active license or certification that is appraiser qualifications board compliant in the other jurisdiction;

“Appraisal” means the act or process of developing an opinion of value of identified real estate. That opinion of value may be numerically expressed either as a specific amount, as a range of numbers or as a relationship to a previous value opinion or other numerical benchmark;

“Appraisal assignment” means an engagement for which an appraiser is employed or retained to act, or would be perceived by third parties or the public as acting, as a disinterested third party in rendering an unbiased analysis, opinion or conclusion relating to the nature, quality, value or utility of specified interests in, or aspects of, identified real estate;

“Appraisal foundation” means the appraisal foundation incorporated as an Illinois not for profit corporation on November 30, 1987;

“Appraisal report” means any communication, written or oral, of an opinion of value of identified real estate. For the purposes of this chapter, an appraiser who testifies as to the value of an identified real property is deemed to have provided an oral appraisal report;

“Certified appraisal report” means a written or oral appraisal report that is certified as such by a state certified real estate appraiser. Some federal agencies require appraisals to be in writing;

“Commission” means the real estate appraiser commission established pursuant to § 62-39-201;

“Real estate” means an identified parcel or tract of land, including improvements, if any;

“Real estate appraisal activity” means the act or process of making an appraisal of real estate or real property and preparing an appraisal report;

“Real estate appraiser” means a person who engages in real estate appraisal activity for a fee or other valuable consideration;

“Real property” means one (1) or more defined interests, benefits and rights inherent in the ownership of real estate;

“Review assignment” means an analysis, opinion or conclusion prepared by a real estate appraiser that forms an opinion as to the adequacy and appropriateness of a valuation appraisal or an analysis assignment;

“Specialized services” means those appraisal services that do not fall within the definition of appraisal assignment. “Specialized services” may include valuation work and analysis work. Regardless of the intention of the client or employer, if the appraiser would be perceived by third parties or the public as acting as a disinterested third party in rendering an unbiased analysis, opinion or conclusion, the work is classified as an appraisal assignment and not specialized services;

“State certified real estate appraiser” means a person who develops and communicates real estate appraisals and who holds a current, valid certificate issued to the person for either general or residential real estate under this chapter;

“State licensed real estate appraiser” means a person who holds a current, valid real estate appraiser license issued pursuant to this chapter; and

“Valuation appraisal” refers to an analysis, opinion or conclusion prepared by a real estate appraiser that estimates the value of an identified parcel of real estate or identified real property at a particular point in time.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, §§ 3, 39; 1991, ch. 366, §§ 1-3; 1992, ch. 697, §§ 2-4; 2008, ch. 727, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 279, § 8; 2014, ch. 621, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 621, § 3 provided that the Tennessee real estate appraiser commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Employing or retaining an appraiser as disinterested third party or for specialized services, § 62-39-330.

Attorney General Opinions. Whether an “evaluation” of real property constitutes an “appraisal” and an “appraisal report”. OAG 10-25, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (3/5/10).

62-39-103. License or certificate required.

Except as provided in § 62-39-104, it is unlawful for anyone to solicit an appraisal assignment or to prepare an appraisal or an appraisal report relating to real estate or real property in this state without first obtaining a real estate appraiser's license or certificate.

This section shall not be construed to apply to individuals who render professional assistance in arriving at a real estate analysis, opinion or conclusion.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any person who is licensed to practice in this state under any other law from engaging in the practice for which the person is licensed.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 4; 1991, ch. 366, §§ 4, 5; 1995, ch. 222, § 1.

62-39-104. Applicability.

This chapter does not apply to a real estate broker or salesperson licensed by this state who, in the ordinary course of business, gives an opinion to a potential seller or third party as to the recommended listing price of real estate or an opinion to a potential purchaser or third party as to the recommended purchase price of real estate. This opinion as to the listing price or the purchase price shall not be referred to as an appraisal and no opinion shall be rendered as to the value of the real estate or real property.

This chapter does not apply to a full-time employee who, in the ordinary course of business, gives an opinion of the value of real estate to the employee's employer; provided, that the opinion may not be represented as an appraisal.

This chapter shall in no way affect any person who is registered with the state board of equalization in accordance with § 67-5-1514 while performing any service of any nature for any taxpayer before any tax or assessment authority, agency or board of equalization.

This chapter does not apply to any evaluation of the value of real estate serving as collateral for a loan made by a federally regulated financial institution or to any evaluation of the value of the assets of a trust held by the institution; provided, that:

The applicable federal regulator does not require an appraisal by a state-licensed or state-certified appraiser for the loan or trust;

The evaluation is used solely by the financial institutions in their records to document the collateral or asset value;

The evaluation shall be labeled on its face “this is not an appraisal”; and

Individuals performing these evaluations may be compensated for their services.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a state-licensed or state-certified appraiser from performing the evaluation.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 5; 1991, ch. 366, § 6; 1992, ch. 697, § 5; 1994, ch. 605, § 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Whether an “evaluation” of real property constitutes an “appraisal” and an “appraisal report”. OAG 10-25, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (3/5/10).

62-39-105. Certification — Restrictions on use — Prerequisite to preparing and signing certified appraisal.

No person other than a state certified real estate appraiser under this chapter shall assume or use that title or any title, designation or abbreviation likely to create the impression of certification as a real estate appraiser by this state.

Only an individual who has qualified as a state certified real estate appraiser under this chapter is authorized to prepare and sign a certified appraisal report relating to real estate or real property in this state.

If an appraisal report is prepared and signed by a state certified real estate appraiser and the appraisal report is certified as such by the state certified real estate appraiser, a holder of a real estate appraiser license or a certificate of registration as a real estate appraiser trainee who assisted in the preparation of the appraisal report is authorized to co-sign the appraisal report.

An individual who has not qualified as a state certified real estate appraiser shall not describe nor refer to any appraisal or appraisal report relating to real estate or real property in this state by the terms “certified appraisal” or “certified appraisal report.”

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 6; 2009, ch. 279, § 9.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 62-39-319.

62-39-106. State law not to be more stringent than federal law.

No state law regulating real estate appraisers shall be more stringent than any federal law regulating real estate appraisers.

Acts 1992, ch. 697, § 7.